src/hyph-fi-x-basic.pat.txt
UTF-8
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1by
1bä
1bö
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1dä
1dö
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1fä
1fö
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1gä
1gö
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1hä
1hö
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1jy
1jä
1jö
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1kä
1kö
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1lä
1lö
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1mä
1mö
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1nä
1nö
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1pä
1pö
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1rä
1rö
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1sä
1sö
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1tä
1tö
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1vä
1vö
a1b
a1d
a1f
a1g
a1h
a1j
a1k
a1l
a1m
a1n
a1p
a1r
a1s
a1t
a1v
e1b
e1d
e1f
e1g
e1h
e1j
e1k
e1l
e1m
e1n
e1p
e1r
e1s
e1t
e1v
i1b
i1d
i1f
i1g
i1h
i1j
i1k
i1l
i1m
i1n
i1p
i1r
i1s
i1t
i1v
o1b
o1d
o1f
o1g
o1h
o1j
o1k
o1l
o1m
o1n
o1p
o1r
o1s
o1t
o1v
u1b
u1d
u1f
u1g
u1h
u1j
u1k
u1l
u1m
u1n
u1p
u1r
u1s
u1t
u1v
y1b
y1d
y1f
y1g
y1h
y1j
y1k
y1l
y1m
y1n
y1p
y1r
y1s
y1t
y1v
ä1b
ä1d
ä1f
ä1g
ä1h
ä1j
ä1k
ä1l
ä1m
ä1n
ä1p
ä1r
ä1s
ä1t
ä1v
ö1b
ö1d
ö1f
ö1g
ö1h
ö1j
ö1k
ö1l
ö1m
ö1n
ö1p
ö1r
ö1s
ö1t
ö1v
a2a
a2e
a2i
a2o
a2u
a2y
a2ä
a2ö
e2a
e2e
e2i
e2o
e2u
e2y
e2ä
e2ö
i2a
i2e
i2i
i2o
i2u
i2y
i2ä
i2ö
o2a
o2e
o2i
o2o
o2u
o2y
o2ä
o2ö
u2a
u2e
u2i
u2o
u2u
u2y
u2ä
u2ö
y2a
y2e
y2i
y2o
y2u
y2y
y2ä
y2ö
ä2a
ä2e
ä2i
ä2o
ä2u
ä2y
ä2ä
ä2ö
ö2a
ö2e
ö2i
ö2o
ö2u
ö2y
ö2ä
ö2ö
a2i
a2u
i2e
e2i
e2u
u2o
o2i
i2u
y2ö
u2i
o2u
e2y
y2i
ä2y
i2y
ä2i
ö2y
ö2i
a2bb
a2bd
a2bf
a2bg
a2bh
a2bj
a2bk
a2bl
a2bm
a2bn
a2bp
a2br
a2bs
a2bt
a2bv
a2db
a2dd
a2df
a2dg
a2dh
a2dj
a2dk
a2dl
a2dm
a2dn
a2dp
a2dr
a2ds
a2dt
a2dv
a2fb
a2fd
a2ff
a2fg
a2fh
a2fj
a2fk
a2fl
a2fm
a2fn
a2fp
a2fr
a2fs
a2ft
a2fv
a2gb
a2gd
a2gf
a2gg
a2gh
a2gj
a2gk
a2gl
a2gm
a2gn
a2gp
a2gr
a2gs
a2gt
a2gv
a2hb
a2hd
a2hf
a2hg
a2hh
a2hj
a2hk
a2hl
a2hm
a2hn
a2hp
a2hr
a2hs
a2ht
a2hv
a2jb
a2jd
a2jf
a2jg
a2jh
a2jj
a2jk
a2jl
a2jm
a2jn
a2jp
a2jr
a2js
a2jt
a2jv
a2kb
a2kd
a2kf
a2kg
a2kh
a2kj
a2kk
a2kl
a2km
a2kn
a2kp
a2kr
a2ks
a2kt
a2kv
a2lb
a2ld
a2lf
a2lg
a2lh
a2lj
a2lk
a2ll
a2lm
a2ln
a2lp
a2lr
a2ls
a2lt
a2lv
a2mb
a2md
a2mf
a2mg
a2mh
a2mj
a2mk
a2ml
a2mm
a2mn
a2mp
a2mr
a2ms
a2mt
a2mv
a2nb
a2nd
a2nf
a2ng
a2nh
a2nj
a2nk
a2nl
a2nm
a2nn
a2np
a2nr
a2ns
a2nt
a2nv
a2pb
a2pd
a2pf
a2pg
a2ph
a2pj
a2pk
a2pl
a2pm
a2pn
a2pp
a2pr
a2ps
a2pt
a2pv
a2rb
a2rd
a2rf
a2rg
a2rh
a2rj
a2rk
a2rl
a2rm
a2rn
a2rp
a2rr
a2rs
a2rt
a2rv
a2sb
a2sd
a2sf
a2sg
a2sh
a2sj
a2sk
a2sl
a2sm
a2sn
a2sp
a2sr
a2ss
a2st
a2sv
a2tb
a2td
a2tf
a2tg
a2th
a2tj
a2tk
a2tl
a2tm
a2tn
a2tp
a2tr
a2ts
a2tt
a2tv
a2vb
a2vd
a2vf
a2vg
a2vh
a2vj
a2vk
a2vl
a2vm
a2vn
a2vp
a2vr
a2vs
a2vt
a2vv
e2bb
e2bd
e2bf
e2bg
e2bh
e2bj
e2bk
e2bl
e2bm
e2bn
e2bp
e2br
e2bs
e2bt
e2bv
e2db
e2dd
e2df
e2dg
e2dh
e2dj
e2dk
e2dl
e2dm
e2dn
e2dp
e2dr
e2ds
e2dt
e2dv
e2fb
e2fd
e2ff
e2fg
e2fh
e2fj
e2fk
e2fl
e2fm
e2fn
e2fp
e2fr
e2fs
e2ft
e2fv
e2gb
e2gd
e2gf
e2gg
e2gh
e2gj
e2gk
e2gl
e2gm
e2gn
e2gp
e2gr
e2gs
e2gt
e2gv
e2hb
e2hd
e2hf
e2hg
e2hh
e2hj
e2hk
e2hl
e2hm
e2hn
e2hp
e2hr
e2hs
e2ht
e2hv
e2jb
e2jd
e2jf
e2jg
e2jh
e2jj
e2jk
e2jl
e2jm
e2jn
e2jp
e2jr
e2js
e2jt
e2jv
e2kb
e2kd
e2kf
e2kg
e2kh
e2kj
e2kk
e2kl
e2km
e2kn
e2kp
e2kr
e2ks
e2kt
e2kv
e2lb
e2ld
e2lf
e2lg
e2lh
e2lj
e2lk
e2ll
e2lm
e2ln
e2lp
e2lr
e2ls
e2lt
e2lv
e2mb
e2md
e2mf
e2mg
e2mh
e2mj
e2mk
e2ml
e2mm
e2mn
e2mp
e2mr
e2ms
e2mt
e2mv
e2nb
e2nd
e2nf
e2ng
e2nh
e2nj
e2nk
e2nl
e2nm
e2nn
e2np
e2nr
e2ns
e2nt
e2nv
e2pb
e2pd
e2pf
e2pg
e2ph
e2pj
e2pk
e2pl
e2pm
e2pn
e2pp
e2pr
e2ps
e2pt
e2pv
e2rb
e2rd
e2rf
e2rg
e2rh
e2rj
e2rk
e2rl
e2rm
e2rn
e2rp
e2rr
e2rs
e2rt
e2rv
e2sb
e2sd
e2sf
e2sg
e2sh
e2sj
e2sk
e2sl
e2sm
e2sn
e2sp
e2sr
e2ss
e2st
e2sv
e2tb
e2td
e2tf
e2tg
e2th
e2tj
e2tk
e2tl
e2tm
e2tn
e2tp
e2tr
e2ts
e2tt
e2tv
e2vb
e2vd
e2vf
e2vg
e2vh
e2vj
e2vk
e2vl
e2vm
e2vn
e2vp
e2vr
e2vs
e2vt
e2vv
i2bb
i2bd
i2bf
i2bg
i2bh
i2bj
i2bk
i2bl
i2bm
i2bn
i2bp
i2br
i2bs
i2bt
i2bv
i2db
i2dd
i2df
i2dg
i2dh
i2dj
i2dk
i2dl
i2dm
i2dn
i2dp
i2dr
i2ds
i2dt
i2dv
i2fb
i2fd
i2ff
i2fg
i2fh
i2fj
i2fk
i2fl
i2fm
i2fn
i2fp
i2fr
i2fs
i2ft
i2fv
i2gb
i2gd
i2gf
i2gg
i2gh
i2gj
i2gk
i2gl
i2gm
i2gn
i2gp
i2gr
i2gs
i2gt
i2gv
i2hb
i2hd
i2hf
i2hg
i2hh
i2hj
i2hk
i2hl
i2hm
i2hn
i2hp
i2hr
i2hs
i2ht
i2hv
i2jb
i2jd
i2jf
i2jg
i2jh
i2jj
i2jk
i2jl
i2jm
i2jn
i2jp
i2jr
i2js
i2jt
i2jv
i2kb
i2kd
i2kf
i2kg
i2kh
i2kj
i2kk
i2kl
i2km
i2kn
i2kp
i2kr
i2ks
i2kt
i2kv
i2lb
i2ld
i2lf
i2lg
i2lh
i2lj
i2lk
i2ll
i2lm
i2ln
i2lp
i2lr
i2ls
i2lt
i2lv
i2mb
i2md
i2mf
i2mg
i2mh
i2mj
i2mk
i2ml
i2mm
i2mn
i2mp
i2mr
i2ms
i2mt
i2mv
i2nb
i2nd
i2nf
i2ng
i2nh
i2nj
i2nk
i2nl
i2nm
i2nn
i2np
i2nr
i2ns
i2nt
i2nv
i2pb
i2pd
i2pf
i2pg
i2ph
i2pj
i2pk
i2pl
i2pm
i2pn
i2pp
i2pr
i2ps
i2pt
i2pv
i2rb
i2rd
i2rf
i2rg
i2rh
i2rj
i2rk
i2rl
i2rm
i2rn
i2rp
i2rr
i2rs
i2rt
i2rv
i2sb
i2sd
i2sf
i2sg
i2sh
i2sj
i2sk
i2sl
i2sm
i2sn
i2sp
i2sr
i2ss
i2st
i2sv
i2tb
i2td
i2tf
i2tg
i2th
i2tj
i2tk
i2tl
i2tm
i2tn
i2tp
i2tr
i2ts
i2tt
i2tv
i2vb
i2vd
i2vf
i2vg
i2vh
i2vj
i2vk
i2vl
i2vm
i2vn
i2vp
i2vr
i2vs
i2vt
i2vv
o2bb
o2bd
o2bf
o2bg
o2bh
o2bj
o2bk
o2bl
o2bm
o2bn
o2bp
o2br
o2bs
o2bt
o2bv
o2db
o2dd
o2df
o2dg
o2dh
o2dj
o2dk
o2dl
o2dm
o2dn
o2dp
o2dr
o2ds
o2dt
o2dv
o2fb
o2fd
o2ff
o2fg
o2fh
o2fj
o2fk
o2fl
o2fm
o2fn
o2fp
o2fr
o2fs
o2ft
o2fv
o2gb
o2gd
o2gf
o2gg
o2gh
o2gj
o2gk
o2gl
o2gm
o2gn
o2gp
o2gr
o2gs
o2gt
o2gv
o2hb
o2hd
o2hf
o2hg
o2hh
o2hj
o2hk
o2hl
o2hm
o2hn
o2hp
o2hr
o2hs
o2ht
o2hv
o2jb
o2jd
o2jf
o2jg
o2jh
o2jj
o2jk
o2jl
o2jm
o2jn
o2jp
o2jr
o2js
o2jt
o2jv
o2kb
o2kd
o2kf
o2kg
o2kh
o2kj
o2kk
o2kl
o2km
o2kn
o2kp
o2kr
o2ks
o2kt
o2kv
o2lb
o2ld
o2lf
o2lg
o2lh
o2lj
o2lk
o2ll
o2lm
o2ln
o2lp
o2lr
o2ls
o2lt
o2lv
o2mb
o2md
o2mf
o2mg
o2mh
o2mj
o2mk
o2ml
o2mm
o2mn
o2mp
o2mr
o2ms
o2mt
o2mv
o2nb
o2nd
o2nf
o2ng
o2nh
o2nj
o2nk
o2nl
o2nm
o2nn
o2np
o2nr
o2ns
o2nt
o2nv
o2pb
o2pd
o2pf
o2pg
o2ph
o2pj
o2pk
o2pl
o2pm
o2pn
o2pp
o2pr
o2ps
o2pt
o2pv
o2rb
o2rd
o2rf
o2rg
o2rh
o2rj
o2rk
o2rl
o2rm
o2rn
o2rp
o2rr
o2rs
o2rt
o2rv
o2sb
o2sd
o2sf
o2sg
o2sh
o2sj
o2sk
o2sl
o2sm
o2sn
o2sp
o2sr
o2ss
o2st
o2sv
o2tb
o2td
o2tf
o2tg
o2th
o2tj
o2tk
o2tl
o2tm
o2tn
o2tp
o2tr
o2ts
o2tt
o2tv
o2vb
o2vd
o2vf
o2vg
o2vh
o2vj
o2vk
o2vl
o2vm
o2vn
o2vp
o2vr
o2vs
o2vt
o2vv
u2bb
u2bd
u2bf
u2bg
u2bh
u2bj
u2bk
u2bl
u2bm
u2bn
u2bp
u2br
u2bs
u2bt
u2bv
u2db
u2dd
u2df
u2dg
u2dh
u2dj
u2dk
u2dl
u2dm
u2dn
u2dp
u2dr
u2ds
u2dt
u2dv
u2fb
u2fd
u2ff
u2fg
u2fh
u2fj
u2fk
u2fl
u2fm
u2fn
u2fp
u2fr
u2fs
u2ft
u2fv
u2gb
u2gd
u2gf
u2gg
u2gh
u2gj
u2gk
u2gl
u2gm
u2gn
u2gp
u2gr
u2gs
u2gt
u2gv
u2hb
u2hd
u2hf
u2hg
u2hh
u2hj
u2hk
u2hl
u2hm
u2hn
u2hp
u2hr
u2hs
u2ht
u2hv
u2jb
u2jd
u2jf
u2jg
u2jh
u2jj
u2jk
u2jl
u2jm
u2jn
u2jp
u2jr
u2js
u2jt
u2jv
u2kb
u2kd
u2kf
u2kg
u2kh
u2kj
u2kk
u2kl
u2km
u2kn
u2kp
u2kr
u2ks
u2kt
u2kv
u2lb
u2ld
u2lf
u2lg
u2lh
u2lj
u2lk
u2ll
u2lm
u2ln
u2lp
u2lr
u2ls
u2lt
u2lv
u2mb
u2md
u2mf
u2mg
u2mh
u2mj
u2mk
u2ml
u2mm
u2mn
u2mp
u2mr
u2ms
u2mt
u2mv
u2nb
u2nd
u2nf
u2ng
u2nh
u2nj
u2nk
u2nl
u2nm
u2nn
u2np
u2nr
u2ns
u2nt
u2nv
u2pb
u2pd
u2pf
u2pg
u2ph
u2pj
u2pk
u2pl
u2pm
u2pn
u2pp
u2pr
u2ps
u2pt
u2pv
u2rb
u2rd
u2rf
u2rg
u2rh
u2rj
u2rk
u2rl
u2rm
u2rn
u2rp
u2rr
u2rs
u2rt
u2rv
u2sb
u2sd
u2sf
u2sg
u2sh
u2sj
u2sk
u2sl
u2sm
u2sn
u2sp
u2sr
u2ss
u2st
u2sv
u2tb
u2td
u2tf
u2tg
u2th
u2tj
u2tk
u2tl
u2tm
u2tn
u2tp
u2tr
u2ts
u2tt
u2tv
u2vb
u2vd
u2vf
u2vg
u2vh
u2vj
u2vk
u2vl
u2vm
u2vn
u2vp
u2vr
u2vs
u2vt
u2vv
y2bb
y2bd
y2bf
y2bg
y2bh
y2bj
y2bk
y2bl
y2bm
y2bn
y2bp
y2br
y2bs
y2bt
y2bv
y2db
y2dd
y2df
y2dg
y2dh
y2dj
y2dk
y2dl
y2dm
y2dn
y2dp
y2dr
y2ds
y2dt
y2dv
y2fb
y2fd
y2ff
y2fg
y2fh
y2fj
y2fk
y2fl
y2fm
y2fn
y2fp
y2fr
y2fs
y2ft
y2fv
y2gb
y2gd
y2gf
y2gg
y2gh
y2gj
y2gk
y2gl
y2gm
y2gn
y2gp
y2gr
y2gs
y2gt
y2gv
y2hb
y2hd
y2hf
y2hg
y2hh
y2hj
y2hk
y2hl
y2hm
y2hn
y2hp
y2hr
y2hs
y2ht
y2hv
y2jb
y2jd
y2jf
y2jg
y2jh
y2jj
y2jk
y2jl
y2jm
y2jn
y2jp
y2jr
y2js
y2jt
y2jv
y2kb
y2kd
y2kf
y2kg
y2kh
y2kj
y2kk
y2kl
y2km
y2kn
y2kp
y2kr
y2ks
y2kt
y2kv
y2lb
y2ld
y2lf
y2lg
y2lh
y2lj
y2lk
y2ll
y2lm
y2ln
y2lp
y2lr
y2ls
y2lt
y2lv
y2mb
y2md
y2mf
y2mg
y2mh
y2mj
y2mk
y2ml
y2mm
y2mn
y2mp
y2mr
y2ms
y2mt
y2mv
y2nb
y2nd
y2nf
y2ng
y2nh
y2nj
y2nk
y2nl
y2nm
y2nn
y2np
y2nr
y2ns
y2nt
y2nv
y2pb
y2pd
y2pf
y2pg
y2ph
y2pj
y2pk
y2pl
y2pm
y2pn
y2pp
y2pr
y2ps
y2pt
y2pv
y2rb
y2rd
y2rf
y2rg
y2rh
y2rj
y2rk
y2rl
y2rm
y2rn
y2rp
y2rr
y2rs
y2rt
y2rv
y2sb
y2sd
y2sf
y2sg
y2sh
y2sj
y2sk
y2sl
y2sm
y2sn
y2sp
y2sr
y2ss
y2st
y2sv
y2tb
y2td
y2tf
y2tg
y2th
y2tj
y2tk
y2tl
y2tm
y2tn
y2tp
y2tr
y2ts
y2tt
y2tv
y2vb
y2vd
y2vf
y2vg
y2vh
y2vj
y2vk
y2vl
y2vm
y2vn
y2vp
y2vr
y2vs
y2vt
y2vv
ä2bb
ä2bd
ä2bf
ä2bg
ä2bh
ä2bj
ä2bk
ä2bl
ä2bm
ä2bn
ä2bp
ä2br
ä2bs
ä2bt
ä2bv
ä2db
ä2dd
ä2df
ä2dg
ä2dh
ä2dj
ä2dk
ä2dl
ä2dm
ä2dn
ä2dp
ä2dr
ä2ds
ä2dt
ä2dv
ä2fb
ä2fd
ä2ff
ä2fg
ä2fh
ä2fj
ä2fk
ä2fl
ä2fm
ä2fn
ä2fp
ä2fr
ä2fs
ä2ft
ä2fv
ä2gb
ä2gd
ä2gf
ä2gg
ä2gh
ä2gj
ä2gk
ä2gl
ä2gm
ä2gn
ä2gp
ä2gr
ä2gs
ä2gt
ä2gv
ä2hb
ä2hd
ä2hf
ä2hg
ä2hh
ä2hj
ä2hk
ä2hl
ä2hm
ä2hn
ä2hp
ä2hr
ä2hs
ä2ht
ä2hv
ä2jb
ä2jd
ä2jf
ä2jg
ä2jh
ä2jj
ä2jk
ä2jl
ä2jm
ä2jn
ä2jp
ä2jr
ä2js
ä2jt
ä2jv
ä2kb
ä2kd
ä2kf
ä2kg
ä2kh
ä2kj
ä2kk
ä2kl
ä2km
ä2kn
ä2kp
ä2kr
ä2ks
ä2kt
ä2kv
ä2lb
ä2ld
ä2lf
ä2lg
ä2lh
ä2lj
ä2lk
ä2ll
ä2lm
ä2ln
ä2lp
ä2lr
ä2ls
ä2lt
ä2lv
ä2mb
ä2md
ä2mf
ä2mg
ä2mh
ä2mj
ä2mk
ä2ml
ä2mm
ä2mn
ä2mp
ä2mr
ä2ms
ä2mt
ä2mv
ä2nb
ä2nd
ä2nf
ä2ng
ä2nh
ä2nj
ä2nk
ä2nl
ä2nm
ä2nn
ä2np
ä2nr
ä2ns
ä2nt
ä2nv
ä2pb
ä2pd
ä2pf
ä2pg
ä2ph
ä2pj
ä2pk
ä2pl
ä2pm
ä2pn
ä2pp
ä2pr
ä2ps
ä2pt
ä2pv
ä2rb
ä2rd
ä2rf
ä2rg
ä2rh
ä2rj
ä2rk
ä2rl
ä2rm
ä2rn
ä2rp
ä2rr
ä2rs
ä2rt
ä2rv
ä2sb
ä2sd
ä2sf
ä2sg
ä2sh
ä2sj
ä2sk
ä2sl
ä2sm
ä2sn
ä2sp
ä2sr
ä2ss
ä2st
ä2sv
ä2tb
ä2td
ä2tf
ä2tg
ä2th
ä2tj
ä2tk
ä2tl
ä2tm
ä2tn
ä2tp
ä2tr
ä2ts
ä2tt
ä2tv
ä2vb
ä2vd
ä2vf
ä2vg
ä2vh
ä2vj
ä2vk
ä2vl
ä2vm
ä2vn
ä2vp
ä2vr
ä2vs
ä2vt
ä2vv
ö2bb
ö2bd
ö2bf
ö2bg
ö2bh
ö2bj
ö2bk
ö2bl
ö2bm
ö2bn
ö2bp
ö2br
ö2bs
ö2bt
ö2bv
ö2db
ö2dd
ö2df
ö2dg
ö2dh
ö2dj
ö2dk
ö2dl
ö2dm
ö2dn
ö2dp
ö2dr
ö2ds
ö2dt
ö2dv
ö2fb
ö2fd
ö2ff
ö2fg
ö2fh
ö2fj
ö2fk
ö2fl
ö2fm
ö2fn
ö2fp
ö2fr
ö2fs
ö2ft
ö2fv
ö2gb
ö2gd
ö2gf
ö2gg
ö2gh
ö2gj
ö2gk
ö2gl
ö2gm
ö2gn
ö2gp
ö2gr
ö2gs
ö2gt
ö2gv
ö2hb
ö2hd
ö2hf
ö2hg
ö2hh
ö2hj
ö2hk
ö2hl
ö2hm
ö2hn
ö2hp
ö2hr
ö2hs
ö2ht
ö2hv
ö2jb
ö2jd
ö2jf
ö2jg
ö2jh
ö2jj
ö2jk
ö2jl
ö2jm
ö2jn
ö2jp
ö2jr
ö2js
ö2jt
ö2jv
ö2kb
ö2kd
ö2kf
ö2kg
ö2kh
ö2kj
ö2kk
ö2kl
ö2km
ö2kn
ö2kp
ö2kr
ö2ks
ö2kt
ö2kv
ö2lb
ö2ld
ö2lf
ö2lg
ö2lh
ö2lj
ö2lk
ö2ll
ö2lm
ö2ln
ö2lp
ö2lr
ö2ls
ö2lt
ö2lv
ö2mb
ö2md
ö2mf
ö2mg
ö2mh
ö2mj
ö2mk
ö2ml
ö2mm
ö2mn
ö2mp
ö2mr
ö2ms
ö2mt
ö2mv
ö2nb
ö2nd
ö2nf
ö2ng
ö2nh
ö2nj
ö2nk
ö2nl
ö2nm
ö2nn
ö2np
ö2nr
ö2ns
ö2nt
ö2nv
ö2pb
ö2pd
ö2pf
ö2pg
ö2ph
ö2pj
ö2pk
ö2pl
ö2pm
ö2pn
ö2pp
ö2pr
ö2ps
ö2pt
ö2pv
ö2rb
ö2rd
ö2rf
ö2rg
ö2rh
ö2rj
ö2rk
ö2rl
ö2rm
ö2rn
ö2rp
ö2rr
ö2rs
ö2rt
ö2rv
ö2sb
ö2sd
ö2sf
ö2sg
ö2sh
ö2sj
ö2sk
ö2sl
ö2sm
ö2sn
ö2sp
ö2sr
ö2ss
ö2st
ö2sv
ö2tb
ö2td
ö2tf
ö2tg
ö2th
ö2tj
ö2tk
ö2tl
ö2tm
ö2tn
ö2tp
ö2tr
ö2ts
ö2tt
ö2tv
ö2vb
ö2vd
ö2vf
ö2vg
ö2vh
ö2vj
ö2vk
ö2vl
ö2vm
ö2vn
ö2vp
ö2vr
ö2vs
ö2vt
ö2vv
